Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 36. Disposition of Recovered or Seized Property; Preservation of Evidence.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to abandoned property, see AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d, Searches and Seizures, §§ 301-304.

79 C.J.S., Searches and Seizures, § 276 et seq.